Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,345
Snowmobile; confiscation; sale; proceeds; disposition.

A peace officer shall seize any snowmobile used for the purpose of gaining access to property for the purpose of committing a felony thereon. Any snowmobile seized pursuant to this section shall be held, subject to the order of the district court of the county in which such felony was committed, and shall be confiscated after conviction of the person from whom the snowmobile was seized and disposed of by public auction which shall be conducted by the sheriff of the county in which such conviction occurred. The proceeds from the sale of a confiscated snowmobile shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the permanent school fund.

Laws 1971, LB 330, § 22;

Laws 1977, LB 230, § 17;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2022;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 441.